Massachusetts, session 194th, S1125.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 258B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking the last paragraph beginning with the words “there shall be
conspicuously posted” and inserting the following:-
There shall be conspicuously posted in all courthouses and police stations a summary of
the rights afforded under this section. To satisfy this requirement, the victim and witness
assistance board, pursuant to section 4, shall provide information on the rights afforded to
victims and witnesses to court officials and police chiefs. Information may be provided in printed
or digital formats. The board shall provide information in the top five languages spoken at home,
other than English, as provided by the most recent federal census data.
of 3

SECTION 2. Section 4 of said chapter 258B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking the word “him” in the second paragraph and inserting the following
word:- them
SECTION 3. Said Section 4 of chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking the fourth paragraph and inserting the following paragraphs:-
The board shall establish, adopt, and maintain bylaws relative to the operation of internal
governance.
In addition to the foregoing, the board shall:
(a) fund and support services that are available to victims across the commonwealth;
(b) provide professional development and community education opportunities for
Massachusetts victim services providers, victims, and allied professionals, including sharing
information relative to the victim and witness rights and services established under this chapter;
(c) advocate for policy and legislative initiatives related to access and support for
victims’ rights and services including but not limited to funding;
(d) assume the management and administration of the Garden of Peace, a public
memorial garden located on the plaza of 100 Cambridge street in the city of Boston to honor
victims of homicide, to receive gifts or grants of money or property to assist the board in the
maintenance and operation of the memorial and to establish an advisory committee which shall
consist of interested residents appointed by the victim witness assistance board to provide advice
to the board;
(e) administer the SAFEPLAN advocacy program.
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 6 of said chapter 258B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking the words “the board”.
of 3